nl: Wakeboardbinding montagepatroon: 6-inch standaard; Plaat (4-punts); Overige
bg-BG: Схема за монтаж на автомати за уейкборд: 6-инчов стандарт; Плоча (с 4 точки); Друго
hr-HR: Uzorak za montažu vezova za wakeboard: Standard od 6 inča; Ploča (4 točke); Ostalo
it: Schema di montaggio degli attacchi sul wakeboard: Standard da 6 pollici; Piastra (a 4 punti); Altro
fi: Wakeboard-siteiden kiinnityskuvio: 6 tuuman vakio; Levy (4-piste); Muu
hu: Wakeboardkötés-rögzítési minta: 6 hüvelykes szabvány; Talpas (4 pontos); Egyéb
ko: 웨이크보드 바인딩 장착 패턴: 6인치 표준; 플레이트(4포인트); 기타
es: Patrón de montaje de fijaciones para la tabla de wakeboard: Estándar de 6 pulgadas; Placa (4 puntos); Otro
pt-BR: Wakeboard padrão de montagem da fixação: Padrão de 6 polegadas; Placa (4 pontos); Outro
zh-TW: 滑水板腳套安裝樣式: 6 吋標準; 底板 (4 點式); 其他
ro-RO: Modelul de montare a legăturilor pentru wakeboard: Standard de 6 inchi; Placă (4 puncte); Altele
fr: Configuration de montage des chausses de wakeboard: Standard 6 pouces; Plaque (4 points); Autre
cs: Schéma montáže vázání pro wakeboard: Standard 6 palců; Deska (4 body); Jiné
nb: Monteringsmønster for wakeboard-binding: 6-tommers standard; Plate (4-punkts); Annet
vi: kiểu gắn dây buộc ván trượt nước: Tiêu chuẩn 6 inch; Dạng tấm (4 điểm); Khác
pt-PT: Padrão de montagem das fixações de wakeboard: Standard de 6 polegadas; Placa (4 pontos); Outro
lt-LT: Vandenlentės apkaustų tvirtinimo standartas: 6 colių standartinis; Plokštelė (4 taškų); Kita
el: Διάταξη οπών στερέωσης δέστρας wakeboard: Τυπικό 6 ιντσών; Πλάκα (4 σημείων); Άλλο
sv: Monteringsmönster för wakeboardbindning: 6-tums standard; Platta (4-punkt); Övrigt
ru: Монтажный шаблон креплений вейкборда: Стандарт 6 дюймов; Пластина (4-точечная); Другое
sk-SK: Schéma montáže viazania na wakeboard: Štandard 6 palcov; Doska (4-bodová); Iné
pl: Układ mocowań wiązań wakeboardu: Standard 6 cali; Płyta (4-punktowa); Inne
en: Wakeboard binding mounting pattern: 6-inch standard; Plate (4-point); Other
sl-SI: Vzorec montaže vezi za wakeboard: Standardni 6-palčni; Plošča (4-točkovna); Drugo
ja: ウェイクボードビンディング取り付けパターン: 6インチ標準; プレート (4点留め); その他
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งอุปกรณ์ยึดสำหรับเวคบอร์ด: มาตรฐาน 6 นิ้ว; แผ่นเพลต (4 จุด); อื่นๆ
de: Montagemuster der Wakeboard-Bindung: 6-Zoll-Standard; Platte (4-Punkt); Sonstiges
zh-CN: 滑水板固定器安装模式: 6 英寸标准; 盘式（4 点）; 其他
da: Monteringsmønster for wakeboardbinding: 6-tommer standard; Plade (4-punkt); Andet
tr: Wakeboard bağlama montaj deseni: 6 inç standart; Plaka (4 noktalı); Diğer